Washington statutes.
RCW 7.77.040

Beginning and concluding collaborative law process.

(1) A collaborative law process begins when the parties sign a collaborative law participation agreement.

(2) A tribunal may not order a party to participate in a collaborative law process over that party's objection.

(3) A collaborative law process is concluded by a:

(a) Resolution of a collaborative matter as evidenced by a signed record;

(b) Resolution of a part of the collaborative matter, evidenced by a signed record, in which the parties agree that the remaining parts of the matter will not be resolved in the process; or

(c) Termination of the process.

(4) A collaborative law process terminates:

(a) When a party gives notice to other parties in a record that the process is ended; or

(b) When a party:

(i) Begins a proceeding related to a collaborative matter without the agreement of all parties; or

(ii) In a pending proceeding related to the matter:

(A) Initiates a pleading, motion, order to show cause, or request for a conference with the tribunal without the agreement of all parties as to the relief sought;

(B) Requests that the proceeding be put on the tribunal's active calendar; or

(C) Takes similar contested action requiring notice to be sent to the parties; or

(c) Except as otherwise provided by subsection (7) of this section, when a party discharges a collaborative lawyer or a collaborative lawyer withdraws from further representation of a party.

(5) A party's collaborative lawyer shall give prompt notice to all other parties in a record of a discharge or withdrawal.

(6) A party may terminate a collaborative law process with or without cause.

(7) Notwithstanding the discharge or withdrawal of a collaborative lawyer, a collaborative law process continues, if not later than thirty days after the date that the notice of the discharge or withdrawal of a collaborative lawyer required by subsection (5) of this section is sent to the parties:

(a) The unrepresented party engages a successor collaborative lawyer; and

(b) In a signed record:

(i) The parties consent to continue the process by reaffirming the collaborative law participation agreement;

(ii) The agreement is amended to identify the successor collaborative lawyer; and

(iii) The successor collaborative lawyer confirms the lawyer's representation of a party in the collaborative law process.

(8) A collaborative law process does not conclude if, with the consent of the parties, a party requests a tribunal to approve a resolution of the collaborative matter or any part thereof as evidenced by a signed record.

(9) A collaborative law participation agreement may provide additional methods of concluding a collaborative law process.

[ 2013 c 119 s 5.]